Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.110

Washington scholars' program—Established—Scope.

There is established by the legislature of the state of Washington the Washington state scholars program. The purposes of this program annually are to:

(1) Provide for the selection of three seniors residing in each legislative district in the state graduating from high schools who have distinguished themselves academically among their peers, except that during fiscal year 2007, no more than two seniors plus one alternate may be selected.

(2) Maximize public awareness of the academic achievement, leadership ability, and community contribution of Washington state public and private high school seniors through appropriate recognition ceremonies and events at both the local and state level.

(3) Provide a listing of the Washington scholars to all Washington state public and private colleges and universities to facilitate communication regarding academic programs and scholarship availability.

(4) Make available a state level mechanism for utilization of private funds for scholarship awards to outstanding high school seniors.

(5) Provide, on written request and with student permission, a listing of the Washington scholars to private scholarship selection committees for notification of scholarship availability.

(6) Permit a waiver of tuition and services and activities fees as provided for in *RCW 28B.15.543 and grants under RCW 28B.76.660.

[ 2005 c 518 s 915; 2004 c 275 s 46; 1994 c 234 s 4; 1988 c 210 s 4; 1987 c 465 s 1; 1981 c 54 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.822.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.15.543 was amended by 2015 c 55 s 219, changing tuition waivers to grants for undergraduate coursework.

Effective date—2005 c 518: "Except for sections 923 and 931 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 17, 2005]." [ 2005 c 518 s 1805.]

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—1981 c 54: See note following RCW 28A.600.100.